Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.205.020

Common school dropouts—Reimbursement.

Only eligible common school dropouts shall be enrolled in a certified education center for reimbursement by the superintendent of public instruction as provided in RCW 28A.205.040. A person is not an eligible common school dropout if: (1) The person has completed high school, (2) the person has not reached his or her twelfth birthday or has passed his or her twentieth birthday, (3) the person shows proficiency beyond the high school level in a test approved by the state board of education to be given as part of the initial diagnostic procedure, or (4) less than one month has passed after the person has dropped out of any common school and the education center has not received written verification from a school official of the common school last attended in this state that the person is no longer in attendance at the school. A person is an eligible common school dropout even if one month has not passed since the person dropped out if the board of directors or its designee, of that common school, requests the center to admit the person because the person has dropped out or because the person is unable to attend a particular common school because of disciplinary reasons, including suspension and/or expulsion. The fact that any person may be subject to RCW 28A.225.010 through 28A.225.140, 28A.200.010, and 28A.200.020 shall not affect his or her qualifications as an eligible common school dropout under this chapter.

[ 1999 c 348 s 3; 1997 c 265 s 7; 1993 c 211 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 181; 1979 ex.s. c 174 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 341 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.97.020.]

NOTES:

Intent—1999 c 348: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.

Severability—1997 c 265: See note following RCW 13.40.160.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 174: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 174 s 4.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 341: See note following RCW 28A.205.010.